Illinois, session 104th, HB3550.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Rivers, Lakes, and Streams Act is amended 5by changing Sections 26a and 35 as follows: 6    (615 ILCS 5/26a)  (from Ch. 19, par. 74)7    Sec. 26a. The Department of Natural Resources may issue 8orders requiring all necessary remedial actions to correct 9violations of this Act and impose the civil penalties provided 10in this Section. All orders entered by the Department of 11Natural Resources shall be made only upon giving reasonable 12notice to persons to be affected by such orders; or having any 13interest in the subject matter of such orders and after a 14hearing in relation thereto. Any person who violates any 15provision of this Act; any rule or regulation adopted by the 16Department; any permit, term, or condition of this Act; or any 17order of the Department under this Act, shall be liable for a 18civil penalty of up to 2 times the applicable permit fee, but 19not to exceed $5,000 for a violation. The penalty fee may, upon 20order of the Department of Natural Resources or a court of 21competent jurisdiction, be made payable to the Department and 22deposited into the Water Resources State Boating Act Fund and 23may be used for the purposes as authorized under Section 59.14   HB3550- 2 -LRB104 10959 LNS 21041 b1of the Environmental Protection Act. The moneys deposited into 2the Water Resources Fund under this Section shall not be 3subject to administrative charges or chargebacks unless 4otherwise authorized by this Act for use by the Department for 5ordinary and contingent expenses.6(Source: P.A. 99-73, eff. 1-1-16.) 7    (615 ILCS 5/35)8    Sec. 35. Permit fees. The Department of Natural Resources 9shall collect a fee of up to $5,000 per application for permits 10issued under this Act. The Department of Natural Resources 11shall set the specific fee applicable to different permits 12issued under this Act by administrative rule, provided that no 13fee exceeds $5,000. All fees collected pursuant to this 14Section shall be deposited in the Water Resources Fund and may 15be used for the purposes as authorized under Section 59.14 of 16the Environmental Protection Act. State Boating Act Fund for 17use by the Department of Natural Resources for the ordinary 18and contingent expenses of the Department of Natural 19Resources. No permit application shall be processed until the 20application fee is paid to the Department of Natural 21Resources. The monies deposited into the Water Resources State 22Boating Act Fund under this Section shall not be subject to 23administrative charges or chargebacks unless otherwise 24authorized by this Act.25(Source: P.A. 97-1136, eff. 1-1-13.)